test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_teltta_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - teltta: # not checked
    teltta+N+Sg+Nom: teltta
    teltta+N+Sg+Gen: teˊlta
    teltta+N+Sg+Acc: teˊlta
    teltta+N+Sg+Ill: teeltan
    teltta+N+Sg+Loc: telttaast
    teltta+N+Sg+Com:  telttain
    teltta+N+Sg+Abe: teˊltattáá
    teltta+N+Ess: telttan
    teltta+N+Par: telttad
    teltta+N+Pl+Nom: teˊltah
    teltta+N+Pl+Gen: teˊltai
    teltta+N+Pl+Gen: teeltai
    teltta+N+Pl+Acc: teeltaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Ill: telttaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Loc: teˊltain
    teltta+N+Pl+Com: teˊltaiguin
    teltta+N+Pl+Abe: teˊltaittáá

  Noun - seŋkka: # - ok
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Nom:  seŋkka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Gen:  seˊŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Acc:  seˊŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Ill:  seeŋkan
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Loc:  seŋkkaast
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Com:  seŋkkain
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Abe:  seˊŋkattáá
    seŋkka+N+Ess:  seŋkkan
    seŋkka+N+Par:  seŋkkad
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Nom:  seˊŋkah
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Gen: [seeŋkai, seˊŋkai]
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Acc:  seeŋkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Ill:  seŋkkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Loc:  seˊŋkain
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Com:  seˊŋkaiguin
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Abe:  seˊŋkaittáá
